Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20101-118
Certified public accountant; reexamination;
waiting period.

(1) The board may by rule and regulation
prescribe the terms and conditions under which a person who does not pass
the examination in one sitting may be reexamined. The board may also provide
by rule and regulation for a reasonable waiting period for reexamination.

(2) A person shall be entitled
to any number of reexaminations under section 1-114 subject to the rules and
regulations of the board.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 13, p. 59;

Laws 1976, LB 619, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 214, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 8.